Nevada, session 83, AB348.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 218E.420 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
218E.420 1. There is hereby created an Interim Retirement
and Benefits Committee of the Legislature to:
(a) Review the operation of the Public Employees’ Retirement
System, the Judicial Retirement System established pursuant to
chapter 1A of NRS , the Legislators’ Retirement System
established pursuant to chapter 218C of NRS and the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program; and
(b) Make recommendations to the Public Employees’
Retirement Board and the Board of the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program, the Legislative Commission and the Legislature.
2. The Interim Retirement and Benefits Committee consists of
six members appointed as follows:
(a) Three members of the Senate, one of whom is the Chair of
the Committee on Finance during the preceding regular session and
two of whom are appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate.
(b) Three members of the Assembly, one of whom is the Chair
of the Committee on Ways and Means during the preceding regular
session and two of whom are appointed by the Speaker of the
Assembly.
3. If any regular member of the Interim Retirement and
Benefits Committee informs the Secretary that the member will be
unable to attend a particular meeting, the Secretary shall notify
the Speaker of the Assembly or the Majority Leader of the Senate,
as the case may be, to appoint an alternate for that meeting from
the same House and political party as the absent member.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the term of
a member of the Interim Retirement and Benefits Committee
expires upon the convening of the next regular legislative session,
unless the member is replaced by the appointing authority. The
membership of any member of the Interim Retirement and
Benefits Committee who is not a candidate for reelection or who is
defeated for reelection terminates on the day next after the general
election.
5. Vacancies on the Interim Retirement and Benefits
Committee must be filled in the same manner as original
appointments.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
6. The Legislative Commission shall review and approve the
budget and work program for the Interim Retirement and Benefits
Committee and any changes to the budget or work program.
[4.] 7. The immediate past Chair of the Senate Standing
Committee on Finance is the Chair of the Interim Retirement and
Benefits Committee for the period ending with the convening of
each odd-numbered regular session. The immediate past Chair of
the Assembly Standing Committee on Ways and Means is the Chair
of the Interim Retirement and Benefits Committee during the next
legislative interim, and the position of Chair alternates between the
Houses according to this pattern.
[5.] 8. The Interim Retirement and Benefits Committee may
exercise the powers conferred on it by law only when the
Legislature is not in a regular or special session and shall meet at the
call of the Chair.
[6.] 9. The Interim Retirement and Benefits Committee may
conduct investigations and hold hearings in connection with its
functions and duties and exercise any of the investigative powers set
forth in NRS 218E.105 to 218E.140, inclusive.
[7.] 10. The Director shall provide a Secretary for the Interim
Retirement and Benefits Committee.
[8.] 11. For each day or portion of a day during which
members of the Interim Retirement and Benefits Committee and
appointed alternates attend a meeting of the Interim Retirement and
Benefits Committee or are otherwise engaged in the business of the
Interim Retirement and Benefits Committee, the members or
appointed alternates are entitled to receive:
(a) The compensation provided for a majority of the Legislators
during the first 60 days of the preceding regular session;
(b) The per diem allowance provided for state officers and
employees generally; and
(c) The travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
[9.] 12. All such compensation, per diem allowances and
travel expenses must be paid from the Legislative Fund.
Sec. 2. NRS 218F.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218F.600 1. The Fiscal Analysis Division consists of the
Senate Fiscal Analyst, the Assembly Fiscal Analyst and such
additional staff as the performance of their duties may require.
2. The Fiscal Analysis Division shall:
(a) Thoroughly examine all agencies of the State with special
regard to their activities and the duplication of efforts between them.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(b) Recommend to the Legislature any suggested changes
looking toward economy and the elimination of inefficiency in
government.
(c) Ascertain facts and make recommendations to the
Legislature concerning the budget of the State and the estimates of
the expenditure requirements of the agencies of the State.
(d) Make projections of future public revenues for the use of the
Legislature.
(e) Analyze the history and probable future trend of the State’s
financial position in order that a sound fiscal policy may be
developed and maintained for the State of Nevada.
(f) [To the extent of available resources, perform a budget stress
test in each even-numbered year comparing the estimated future
revenue to, and the estimated future expenditure from, the major
funds in the State Treasury under various potential economic
conditions and submit a report regarding the results of the test to the
Governor and the Legislature. The Fiscal Analysis Division shall
cause a copy of any such report to be posted on the Internet website
of the Legislature.
(g)] Analyze appropriation bills, revenue bills and bills having a
fiscal impact upon the operation of the government of the State of
Nevada or its political subdivisions.
[(h)] (g) Advise the Legislature and its members and
committees regarding matters of a fiscal nature.
[(i)] (h) Perform such other functions as may be assigned to the
Fiscal Analysis Division by the Legislature, the Legislative
Commission or the Director.
Sec. 3. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
[218E.625,] 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada
2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and
unless otherwise declared by law to be confidential, all public books
and public records of a governmental entity must be open at all
times during office hours to inspection by any person, and may be
fully copied or an abstract or memorandum may be prepared from
those public books and public records. Any such copies, abstracts or
memoranda may be used to supply the general public with copies,
abstracts or memoranda of the records or may be used in any other
way to the advantage of the governmental entity or of the general
public. This section does not supersede or in any manner affect the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in
any other manner the rights of a person in any written book or
record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 4. NRS 385.111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.111 1. The State Board shall prepare a plan to improve
the achievement of pupils enrolled in the public schools in this
State. The plan:
(a) Must be prepared in consultation with:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(1) Employees of the Department;
(2) At least one employee of a school district in a county
whose population is 100,000 or more, appointed by the Nevada
Association of School Boards;
(3) At least one employee of a school district in a county
whose population is less than 100,000, appointed by the Nevada
Association of School Boards; and
(4) At least one representative of the Statewide Council for
the Coordination of the Regional Training Programs created by NRS
391A.130, appointed by the Council; and
(b) May be prepared in consultation with:
(1) Representatives of institutions of higher education;
(2) Representatives of regional educational laboratories;
(3) Representatives of outside consultant groups;
(4) Representatives of the regional training programs for the
professional development of teachers and administrators created by
NRS 391A.120; and
(5) [The Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability
and Program Evaluation; and
(6)] Other persons who the State Board determines are
appropriate.
2. On or before March 31 of each year, the State Board shall
submit the plan or the revised plan, as applicable, to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education;
(c) [Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability and
Program Evaluation;
(d)] Board of Regents of the University of Nevada;
[(e)] (d) Board of trustees of each school district; and
[(f)] (e) Governing body of each charter school.
Sec. 5. NRS 385A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS [385A.020 to]
385A.030, 385A.040 and 385A.050 [, inclusive,] have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 6. NRS 385A.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.090 1. On or before September 30 of each year:
(a) The board of trustees of each school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, each college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education and each city or county that
sponsors a charter school shall provide written notice that the report
required pursuant to NRS 385A.070 is available on the Internet
website maintained by the school district, State Public Charter
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
School Authority, institution or city or county, if any, or otherwise
provide written notice of the availability of the report. The written
notice must be provided to the:
(1) Governor;
(2) State Board;
(3) Department;
(4) Committee; and
(5) [Bureau; and
(6)] The Attorney General, with a specific reference to the
information that is reported pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection
1 of NRS 385A.250.
(b) The board of trustees of each school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, each college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education and each city or county that
sponsors a charter school shall provide for public dissemination of
the annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.070 by posting a copy of the report on the Internet website
maintained by the school district, the State Public Charter School
Authority, the institution or the city or county, if any. If a school
district does not maintain a website, the district shall otherwise
provide for public dissemination of the annual report by providing a
copy of the report to the schools in the school district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, the
residents of the district, and the parents and guardians of pupils
enrolled in schools in the district, including, without limitation, each
charter school sponsored by the district. If the State Public Charter
School Authority, the institution, the city or the county does not
maintain a website, the State Public Charter School Authority, the
institution, the city or the county, as applicable, shall otherwise
provide for public dissemination of the annual report by providing a
copy of the report to each charter school it sponsors and the parents
and guardians of pupils enrolled in each charter school it sponsors.
2. Upon the request of the Governor, the Attorney General, an
entity described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or a member of the
general public, the board of trustees of a school district, the State
Public Charter School Authority, a college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education or a city or county that
sponsors a charter school, as applicable, shall provide a portion or
portions of the report required pursuant to NRS 385A.070.
Sec. 7. NRS 385A.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.400 1. The State Board shall, on or before January 15
of each year, prepare for the immediately preceding school year a
single annual report of accountability that includes, without
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
limitation , the information prescribed by NRS 385A.400 to
385A.520, inclusive.
2. A separate reporting for a group of pupils must not be made
pursuant to NRS 385A.400 to 385A.520, inclusive, if the number of
pupils in that group is insufficient to yield statistically reliable
information or the results would reveal personally identifiable
information about an individual pupil. The Department shall use the
mechanism approved by the United States Department of Education
for the statewide system of accountability for public schools for
determining the minimum number of pupils that must be in a group
for that group to yield statistically reliable information.
3. The annual report of accountability must:
(a) Be prepared in a concise manner; and
(b) Be presented in an understandable and uniform format and,
to the extent practicable, provided in a language that parents can
understand.
4. On or before January 15 of each year, the State Board shall
provide for public dissemination of the annual report of
accountability by posting a copy of the report on the Internet
website maintained by the Department.
5. Upon the request of the Governor, the Attorney General, the
Committee, [the Bureau,] the Board of Regents of the University of
Nevada, the board of trustees of a school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, a college or university within the Nevada
System of Higher Education, the governing body of a charter school
or a member of the general public, the State Board shall provide a
portion or portions of the annual report of accountability.
Sec. 8. NRS 385A.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.650 1. The principal of each school, including, without
limitation, each charter school, shall, in consultation with the
employees of the school, prepare a plan to improve the achievement
of the pupils enrolled in the school.
2. The plan developed pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Include any information prescribed by regulation of the State
Board;
(b) Be developed in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 388.885;
(c) Include, without limitation, methods for evaluating and
improving the school climate in the school; and
(d) Comply with the provisions of 20 U.S.C. § 6311(d).
3. The principal of each school shall, in consultation with the
employees of the school:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(a) Review the plan prepared pursuant to this section annually to
evaluate the effectiveness of the plan; and
(b) Based upon the evaluation of the plan, make revisions, as
necessary, to ensure that the plan is designed to improve the
academic achievement of pupils enrolled in the school.
4. On or before the date prescribed by the Department, the
principal of each school shall submit the plan or the revised plan, as
applicable, to the:
(a) Department;
(b) Committee; and
(c) [Bureau; and
(d)] Board of trustees of the school district in which the school
is located or, if the school is a charter school, the sponsor of the
charter school and the governing body of the charter school.
5. As used in this section, “school climate” means the basis of
which to measure the relationships between pupils and the parents
or legal guardians of pupils and educational personnel, the cultural
and linguistic competence of instructional materials and educational
personnel, the emotional and physical safety of pupils and
educational personnel and the social, emotional and academic
development of pupils and educational personnel.
Sec. 9. NRS 390.830 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.830 1. The State Board shall:
(a) In accordance with guidelines established by the National
Assessment Governing Board and National Center for Education
Statistics and in accordance with 20 U.S.C. §§ 6301 et seq. and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, adopt regulations requiring the
schools of this State that are selected by the National Assessment
Governing Board or the National Center for Education Statistics to
participate in the examinations of the National Assessment of
Educational Progress.
(b) Report the results of those examinations to the:
(1) Governor;
(2) Board of trustees of each school district of this State; and
(3) Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education created
pursuant to NRS 218E.320 . [; and
(4) Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability and
Program Evaluation created pursuant to NRS 218E.625.]
(c) Include in the report required pursuant to paragraph (b) an
analysis and comparison of the results of pupils in this State on the
examinations required by this section with:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(1) The results of pupils throughout this country who
participated in the examinations of the National Assessment of
Educational Progress; and
(2) The results of pupils on the achievement and proficiency
examinations administered pursuant to this chapter.
2. If the report required by subsection 1 indicates that the
percentage of pupils enrolled in the public schools in this State who
are proficient on the National Assessment of Educational Progress
differs by more than 10 percent of the pupils who are proficient on
the examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105, the
Department shall prepare a written report describing the
discrepancy. The report must include, without limitation, a
comparison and evaluation of:
(a) The standards of content and performance for English
language arts and mathematics established pursuant to NRS 389.520
with the standards for English language arts and mathematics that
are tested on the National Assessment.
(b) The standards for proficiency established for the National
Assessment with the standards for proficiency established for the
examinations that are administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
3. The report prepared by the Department pursuant to
subsection 2 must be submitted to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education; and
(c) [Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability and
Program Evaluation; and
(d)] Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public
Schools.
4. The Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public
Schools shall review and evaluate the report provided to the Council
pursuant to subsection 3 to identify any discrepancies in the
standards of content and performance established by the Council
that require revision and a timeline for carrying out the revision, if
necessary. The Council shall submit a written report of its review
and evaluation to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education . [and Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability
and Program Evaluation.]
Sec. 10. NRS 391A.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.190 1. The governing body of each regional training
program shall:
(a) Establish a method for the evaluation of the success of the
regional training program, including, without limitation, the Nevada
Early Literacy Intervention Program. The method must be consistent
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
with the uniform procedures and criteria adopted by the Statewide
Council pursuant to NRS 391A.135 and the standards for
professional development training adopted by the State Board
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 391A.370.
(b) On or before September 1 of each year and before submitting
the annual report pursuant to paragraph (c), submit the annual report
to the Statewide Council for its review and incorporate into the
annual report any revisions recommended by the Statewide Council.
(c) On or before December 1 of each year, submit an annual
report to the State Board, the board of trustees of each school district
served by the regional training program, the Commission on
Professional Standards in Education [,] and the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education [and the Legislative Bureau of
Educational Accountability and Program Evaluation] that includes,
without limitation:
(1) The priorities for training adopted by the governing body
pursuant to NRS 391A.175.
(2) The type of training offered through the regional training
program in the immediately preceding year.
(3) The number of teachers and administrators who received
training through the regional training program in the immediately
preceding year.
(4) The number of administrators who received training
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 391A.125 in the
immediately preceding year.
(5) The number of teachers, administrators and other licensed
educational personnel who received training pursuant to paragraph
(d) of subsection 1 of NRS 391A.125 in the immediately preceding
year.
(6) The number of teachers who received training pursuant to
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS 391A.125
in the immediately preceding year.
(7) The number of paraprofessionals, if any, who received
training through the regional training program in the immediately
preceding year.
(8) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the regional training
program, including, without limitation, the Nevada Early Literacy
Intervention Program, in accordance with the method established
pursuant to paragraph (a).
(9) An evaluation of whether the training included the:
(I) Standards of content and performance established by
the Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools
pursuant to NRS 389.520;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(II) Curriculum and instruction required for the common
core standards adopted by the State Board;
(III) Curriculum and instruction recommended by the
Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada created by NRS 391.455;
and
(IV) Culturally relevant pedagogy, taking into account
cultural diversity and demographic differences throughout this State.
(10) An evaluation of the effectiveness of training on
improving the quality of instruction and the achievement of pupils.
(11) A description of the gifts and grants, if any, received by
the governing body in the immediately preceding year and the gifts
and grants, if any, received by the Statewide Council during the
immediately preceding year on behalf of the regional training
program. The description must include the manner in which the gifts
and grants were expended.
(12) The 5-year plan for the regional training program
prepared pursuant to NRS 391A.175 and any revisions to the plan
made by the governing body in the immediately preceding year.
2. The information included in the annual report pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 must be aggregated for each regional
training program and disaggregated for each school district served
by the regional training program.
3. As used in this section, “paraprofessional” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 391.008.
Sec. 11. NRS 391A.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.205 1. On or before December 1 of each year, the
board of trustees of each school district shall submit, on a form
prescribed by the Department, an annual report concerning the
professional development training offered by the school district to
the State Board, the Commission on Professional Standards in
Education [,] and the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education . [and the Legislative Bureau of Educational
Accountability and Program Evaluation.]
2. The State Board shall prescribe by regulation the contents of
the report required by subsection 1.
Sec. 12. NRS 218E.625 and 385A.020 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 13. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)